Utah statutes.
30-1-2.3.   Validation of marriage to a person with acquired immune deficiency syndrome or other sexually transmitted disease.

Each marriage contracted prior to October 21, 1993, is valid and legal but for the prohibition described in Laws of Utah 1991, Chapter 117, Section 1, Subsection 30-1-2(1) regarding persons afflicted with acquired immune deficiency syndrome, syphilis, or gonorrhea, is hereby valid and made lawful in all respects as though that marriage had been legally contracted in the first instance.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

